Alaska, session 34, HB341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 44.12 is amended by adding a new section to article 2 to read: 04 Sec. 44.12.197. World War II Victory Day. World War II Victory Day is 05 established on May 8 of each year to celebrate the victory of the Allied powers in 06 World War II and honor the sacrifices made by the brave men and women in the 07 United States military who fought for that victory. World War II Victory Day may be 08 observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.